Privacy Notice
Last updated: 9 September 2024
Hargreaves Lansdown takes the privacy and security of your personal information very seriously, and we’re committed to protecting and respecting your privacy.
As Hargreaves Lansdown, we include the entities we’ve listed below in section 1 ("Who we are"). When we use "Hargreaves Lansdown", ‘we’, 'our' or ‘us’ throughout this notice, we’re referring to any one of our entities. All our legal entities are registered in England and Wales, and all may act as data controller of your personal information.
Our Privacy Notice explains which personal information we collect from you, how we store it and use it. It also covers how we treat the information you give to us, and information we take from third parties. It contains important information about your rights. We hope you read the notice carefully so you understand and feel comfortable with how we treat your personal information. By engaging with us in the ways set out in this notice, you confirm that you have read and understood the entirety of this notice, as it applies to you.
This notice applies to individuals who receive our services, as well as individuals who occupy the office locations of our UK premises, including staff, volunteers, candidates, contractors, graduates, apprentices, temporary staff, agency workers, interns, work experience and consultants. Where different activities apply we have called these out in this notice.
We recognise that there are risks to you with us processing your personal information, such as financial loss, distress, inconvenience or loss of control if we do not appropriately handle it. You can find out more information about our security measures in
section 4
.
We are always looking to improve the information we provide to our clients and contacts so if you have any feedback on this Policy, please let us know using our contact details in
section 15
.
We explain in this Policy:
Who we are
Collecting your information
How we use your information
Information security
Our legal basis for using your information
How and when we share your information
Transfers outside of the UK and Europe
How long we store your personal information
Marketing
Your rights
Using our websites
Children
Cookies & similar technologies
Updating this Privacy Policy
Contacting us
Your rights to object:
You have various rights in respect of our use of your personal information as set out in
sections 9 and 10
.  Two of the fundamental rights to be aware of are that you may:
a)   Ask us to stop using your personal information for direct-marketing purposes.  If you exercise this right, we will stop using your personal information for this purpose.
b)	Ask us to consider any valid objections which you have to our use of your personal information where we process your personal information on the basis of our, or another person's, legitimate interest.
You can find out more information in
sections 9 and 10
.
1. Who we are
This Privacy Policy is provided on behalf of all of the Hargreaves Lansdown entities listed below.  All these entities individually can act as data controllers of your personal information:
Entity
Registration number
Hargreaves Lansdown plc
02122142
Hargreaves Lansdown Asset Management Limited
01896481
Hargreaves Lansdown Savings Limited
08355960
Hargreaves Lansdown Advisory Services Limited
03509545
Hargreaves Lansdown Fund Managers Limited
02707155
Hargreaves Lansdown Pension Trustees Limited
01733872
The Hargreaves Lansdown Charitable Foundation
CE007686
The registered office for all of our legal entities is: One College Square South, Anchor Road, Bristol BS1 5HL.
This Policy also applies to the websites that Hargreaves Lansdown operates as described in
section 11
.
2. Collecting your information
We collect and process your information in these circumstances:
a)
When you give us your personal information by phone, email, and via our websites, in writing or otherwise.
This includes, but isn’t limited to, information you give us when you open an account, request quotations, register for email alerts, request literature, signup for newsletters or enter a competition, promotion or survey. The information you give us can include your name, address, email address and other contact information. It can also include your financial and debit card information and other personal details such as your National Insurance number and health information.
b)
When you give us your personal information by phone, email, and via our websites, our HR systems, in writing or otherwise for employment reasons.
This includes, but isn’t limited to, information you give us when you apply for a vacancy, are employed by us and when you visit our office premises. The information you give us can include your name, address, email address and other contact information. It can also include your financial information and other personal details such as your National Insurance number and health information. We can also collect information on your employment, training, and education details including your personal information from a recruitment consultant, referees, and job boards as well as from other staff. This may also include special category data such as data relating to your gender, sexual orientation, racial or ethnic diversity where you agree to provide this.
c)
When you visit our premises:
Because of our security policies and procedures in our office premises, we will collect images of visitors using CCTV footage.
d)
When you visit our website or use our equipment:
When you visit our websites we automatically collect information which includes: the Internet Protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer to the internet, your login information, your geographic location, your browser and browser plug-in type and version, and your operating system and platform. We also collect information about your visit, including the source of your visit, and the full click path and mouse movement through our sites (including date and time). This includes the services you viewed, searches you made on our sites, page response times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page interaction information (such as page scrolling, mouse clicks, mouse movements and keyed text), and how you navigated away from any page and any phone number you use to call our Helpdesk. We collect this type of information using a website recording service and our internal telephone systems.
e)
When we email you:
From time to time when you open an email we’ve sent you, we automatically collect information including your geographic location, browser type and version, the device, and the operating system and platform you’re using. We also collect information about your email consumption, including the full click path from within and on to our sites (including date and time), and whether you opened, deleted, forwarded, printed or unsubscribed from the email, and also how long the email was open.
f)
When we receive your information from third party service providers:
We may receive information about you from third party service providers such as credit reference agencies, payment service providers, outsourced service providers (such as the currency service) or analytics providers. If you have a workplace pension with us, we also receive personal information from your employer.
If we don’t receive all of the personal information we’ve requested from you, then we won’t be able to provide all of our products and services to you.
g)
Where you are a member of staff or candidate:
When we receive your information in relation to a performance of a contract such as employment (including during the contract): this includes but is not limited to details on your right to work in the United Kingdom/Visa information, gender, nationality, performance /appraisal data, family leaves, hours of work, payslips, contact information, bank account, pension, tax, annual leave, sick leave, qualifications, employment history, ethnicity, disability, physical /mental health, racial or ethnic origin, religious or other beliefs of a similar nature, family member’s data for company benefits /emergency contacts, pre-employment checks including offences and alleged offences, criminal proceedings outcomes and sentences.
If we don’t receive all of the personal information we’ve requested from you, then we might not be able to proceed with the intended access to our premises or with a contractual arrangement such as a form of employment.
Some of the personal information that we collect about you or which you provide to us about you or your family members may be special categories of data. Special categories of data include information about physical and mental health, sexual orientation, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, philosophical belief, trade union membership and biometric data. We take special care with this data.
Please see our
Appropriate Policy Document
for further details of specific circumstances in which we process special category personal data or criminal offence data.
3. How we use your information
We use your personal information in the following ways:
To provide you with any services and/or information you request from us. This also includes carrying out any obligations specified in any contracts between us.
To get quotations or arrange investments or insurance for you with regulated entities.
If you contribute to a child’s Junior ISA, we’ll give your name to the parent/guardian who’s responsible for the account.
If you apply for an account with us for someone else, acting with power of attorney, we’ll use the information you give us about the applicant (including information about the applicant’s mental health) and your role as the attorney to provide the product or service you request.
To build a picture of who you are, to inform our business decisions, and to deliver a relevant and personalised experienced.
To comply with our legal and regulatory obligations, co-operate with the court service, our regulators and law enforcement agencies and to prevent and detect crime.
If we learn of your insolvency or bankruptcy (or any insolvency proceedings), we’ll transfer your details to the Official Receiver or appointed insolvency practitioner(s).
To check instructions you’ve given us or to resolve disputes including to establish, exercise or defend our legal rights.
To improve the quality of our services and to train our staff.
To let you know about any changes we make to our service.
To process any job application you submit, or that an agency submits for you.
To tell you (by mail, email, telephone or otherwise) about products and services we think you could be interested in, based on our products you already have or have shown an interest in. You can opt out of this communication at any time.
To confirm your identity and address, which includes using automated decisions when we carry out financial crime checks.
To request your feedback on a product or service via a third party we’ve chosen (we’ll only share your name and email address).
Gathering data for analysis and research, and to provide management information or other services internally and to third parties.
To tailor and customise our services, communications and marketing for you.
To administer our sites and for internal operations, including troubleshooting, data analysis, load management, testing, research, statistical and survey purposes.
To improve our sites to make sure that our content is as effective as we can for you and for your computer.
So we can provide services such as the ‘most popular’ information on our site.
So we can show you and others targeted advertisements when you browse the internet.
So you can choose to participate in interactive features of our sites.
To tailor and customise our services, communications and marketing for you.
As part of our efforts to keep our sites safe and secure and to prevent and detect money laundering, financial crime and other crime.
To monitor, record, store and use any telephone, email or other communication with you. We’ll update your records with any new information you or a third party give us, and we’ll add it to any information we already have.
When you call our main contact phone number, 0117 900 9000, we’ll collect the Calling Line Identification information and keep a copy of the call for training and security purposes. We’ll also use your information to help improve our efficiency and effectiveness.
To deal with any enquiries or issues you have about how we collect, store and use your information, or any requests made by you for a copy of the information we hold about you.
For internal corporate reporting, business administration, ensuring adequate insurance coverage for our business, ensuring the security of company facilities, research and development, and to identify and implement business efficiencies.
Where you are a member of staff or candidate, we will use your personal information in the following ways:
To provide you with a form of employment, or work experience, or access to our office premises. This includes storing the personal information in a file for ongoing usage to fulfil any obligations specified in any contracts between us.
To get quotations or arrange financial services for you and your dependants with regulated entities.
To perform a contractual arrangement such as employment including payment of salary, statutory sick pay processing, processing of relevant information relating to other forms of statutory leave (such as maternity and paternity leave), and providing contractual benefits and references for your future employers.
To perform our legal obligations as an employer such as reporting income to HMRC.
To fulfil health and safety, including disability requirements, by passing medical information within the group and externally such as with statutory sick pay reporting.
To monitor usage of internet, email and data files on our systems as detailed in the Acceptable Use of IT policy which includes information on the details of the monitoring which is carried out (such as network traffic), the conditions in which monitoring will take place, the nature of the monitoring, level of detail accessed. Further information can be found on the intranet in the General Guidance on Monitoring. This activity will only be performed by authorised entities primarily our internal cyber security teams.
To monitor compliance with our internal policies and during use of our equipment or infrastructure we will monitor and log your digital communications and activity (e.g. internet & email usage). The data collected is kept confidential and will only be used and shared for security and crime prevention purposes.
For preventing and detecting crime or other unlawful activity such as with our office premises entry and exit systems.
For our internal systems and policies, including your photograph with our internal email system and emergency contact details so we know who to contact in case you have an emergency at work.
To improve the quality of our services and to support, train and manage our staff.
To process any job application you submit, or that a third party submits for you.
To tell you (by mail, email, telephone or otherwise) about topics we think you could be interested in, based on your contractual terms, such as benefits and our social events. You can opt out of direct marketing communications at any time.
To confirm your identity and address, which includes using automated decisions when we carry out financial crime checks.
Gathering data for analysis and research, and to provide management information or other services internally and to third parties.
To monitor, record, store and use any telephone, email or other communication with you. We’ll update your records with any new information you or a third party give us, and we’ll add it to any information we already have. When you call the HL main contact phone number, 0117 900 9000, we’ll collect the Calling Line Identification information and keep a copy of the call for training and security purposes. Our internal telephone calls may also be recorded. We’ll also use your information to help improve our efficiency and effectiveness.
To comply with our legal and regulatory obligations, co-operate with the court service, our regulators and law enforcement agencies.
To check instructions you’ve given us or to resolve disputes including to establish, exercise or defend our legal rights.
To administer our sites and for internal operations, including troubleshooting, data analysis, load management, testing, research, statistical and survey purposes.
To improve our sites to make sure that our content is as effective as we can for you and for your computer.
As part of our efforts to keep our sites safe and secure and to prevent and detect money laundering, financial crime and other crime.
To maintain our internal record keeping obligations including absence management, disability discrimination, employee relations issues, health and safety requirements and on your training.
To deal with any enquiries or issues you have about how we collect, store and use your information, or any requests made by you for a copy of the information we hold about you.
For internal corporate reporting, business administration, ensuring adequate insurance coverage for our business, ensuring the security of company facilities, research and development, and to identify and implement business efficiencies.
4. Information security
We take the security of your personal data very seriously, and we use appropriate technologies and procedures to protect your personal information.
We keep our data security policies and procedures up to widely accepted international standards. In addition, we review our policies regularly and update them whenever needed to protect you, and to meet our business needs, changes in technology, and regulatory requirements.
Here are examples of the ways we protect your data:
a)	We have appropriate technical and organisational measures in place to protect you against accidental loss and unauthorised access, use, destruction or disclosure of your data.
b)	We have a business continuity and disaster recovery plan that is designed to help us offer our services and protect our people and assets no matter what happens.
c)	We place appropriate restrictions on access to personal information.
d)	We implement measures and controls, including monitoring and physical measures, to store and transfer data securely.
e)	We complete data protection impact assessments in accordance with legal requirements and our business policies.
f)	We provide data security training for our employees.
g)	We use a stringent approach to vendor risk management.
The internet is an open medium and we can’t guarantee that any information you send to us by email or via our sites won’t be intercepted or tampered with. Any transmission is at your own risk. To help protect your personal information and minimise the risk of it being intercepted by unauthorised third parties, our secure servers use Secure Socket Layer v3 (SSL) or Transport Layer Security v1 (TLS) encryption when you submit information to us through our sites. You can see this security is in place when you see "https" and the padlock on your URL bar. Older browsers don’t always support current SSL technology, so we recommend that you use an up-to-date browser. Once we’ve received your information, we use strict procedures and security features to try to prevent unauthorised access. For more information please visit our
security centre
.
5. Our legal basis for using your information
Our legal basis for collecting and using your personal information depends on the exact type of information and how and when we collect it. However, we’ll normally only collect personal information from you, your employer, or another third party where one of the following applies:
a)	We need your personal information to perform a contract with you (for example if you are a client of one of our financial service products, or a member of staff);
b)	It’s in our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (for example, to ensure the security of our website). Our legitimate interests are to:
i.	Run, grow and develop our business;
ii.	Ensure a safe environment for our staff and website visitors;
iii.	Marketing, market research and business development;
iv.	Provide client services; and,
v.	For internal group administrative purposes.
If we rely on our (or another person's) legitimate interests for using your personal information, we will undertake a balancing test to ensure that our (or the other person's) legitimate interests are not outweighed by your personal interests or fundamental rights and freedoms which require protection.
c)	We have your consent (for example you have ticked a box on a form):
We may use your special categories of data (such as health information) where you have provided your consent (which you may withdraw at any time after giving it, as described below).
We may also process your personal information in some cases for marketing purposes on the basis of your consent (which you may withdraw at any time after giving it, as described below).
If we rely on your consent for us to use your personal information in a particular way, but you later change your mind, you may withdraw your consent by
contacting us
and we will stop doing so.
d)	We have a legal obligation to collect your personal information (such as for H.M.R.C. reporting).
When we collect personal information to comply with a legal requirement or to enter into a contract with you, we’ll let you know at that time. We’ll also tell you if providing your personal information is mandatory or not, and what the consequences would be if you don’t provide it. Similarly, if we collect and use your personal information for our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), which are not set out above we’ll tell you at that time what those legitimate interests are.
Where you are a member of staff or candidate, we may use special categories of data (such as health information) and this is to comply with our employer’s obligations to give you rights under employment law such as processing absence records for the purpose of paying statutory sick pay or for processing to assess the working capacity of our staff. Our Appropriate Policy Document (referenced above) provides further details of our lawful basis in these processing scenarios.
HL may implement automated decision making processes and profiling from time to time, such as for the purpose of client segmentation. We do not use your personal information via these methods where there would be a significant or legal effect on you.
6. How and when we share your information
We’ll share your personal information with other members of the Hargreaves Lansdown Group to:
a)	Help us to better understand your needs, run your accounts and improve our products and services. This could be, for example, client modelling, or statistical and trend analysis; and
b)	Contact you to tell you about the products and services we provide and think you could be interested in.
We also share your information with the following third parties: regulators, official authorities, partners, suppliers, sub-contractors including but not limited to payment service providers, advertising networks, our professional advisors such as lawyers, auditors, insurers and information, service and software providers that help us improve and optimise our sites.
Our reasons for sharing your information with these service providers include:
a)	To uphold our part of any contract we enter into with them or you.
b)	To enforce or apply our statutory disclosures or any other agreement or to protect the rights, property or safety of our sites, our users or others.
c)	In agreement with advertisers and advertising networks that require your information so they can select and serve adverts about our services to you and others. We will only share your personal information with third party advertisers in order to help them provide services on our behalf.
d)	With our workplace pensions, or our authorised broker service, when your employer, or their appointed third party, asks us for information about your trades or for the value of your holdings to allow them to comply with their regulatory obligations where you have given us your explicit permission. If you hold a workplace pension with us, we’ll also provide your employer with information about the contributions paid into and fees deducted from your accounts, as well as details of your membership of the relevant scheme.
e) To uphold the security of our IT equipment and office premises.
f) To comply with a legal or regulatory obligation, or to enforce or apply our rights under this policy, our terms and conditions, and other agreements. This includes, but is not limited to, disclosure to regulators, official authorities, or government bodies such as HMRC, sharing of data to pension dashboards, and other relevant entities in accordance with applicable laws and regulations.
Where you are a member of staff or candidate, in addition to the above, we’ll primarily share your personal information with other members of the Hargreaves Lansdown Group to help us to fulfil our statutory and contractual obligations to you. This could be, for example, arranging provision of staff benefits.
We will also disclose your information to third parties:
a)	Where it is in our legitimate interests to do so to run, grow and develop our business:
b)	If we sell or buy any business or assets, we may disclose your personal information to the prospective seller or buyer of such business or assets;
c)	If substantially all of our assets are acquired by a third party, in which case personal information held by us will be one of the transferred assets;
d)	If we are under a duty to disclose or share your personal information: in order to comply with any legal obligation, any lawful request from government, judicial bodies or agencies to make sure we comply with our legal and regulatory obligations; with law enforcement officials; and as may be required to meet national security or law enforcement requirements or prevent illegal activity. The personal information we have collected from you will be shared with fraud prevention agencies, such as Cifas, who will use it to prevent fraud and money-laundering, verify your identity, and detect financial and other crime. If fraud is detected, you could be refused certain services, finance or employment. Further details of how your information will be used by us and these fraud prevention agencies, and your data protection rights, can be obtained at the following link:
www.cifas.org.uk/fpn
.
Where you are a member of staff or candidate who falls under the Senior Manager and Certification Regime, HL has a regulatory obligation to provide certain personal information to the FCA, which the FCA will publish on the Financial Services Register. Please contact the SMCR Office if you have any questions in regard to this.
e)	In order to enforce or apply our terms and conditions or any other agreement or to respond to any claims, to protect our rights or the rights of a third party, to protect the safety of any person or to prevent any illegal activity; or
f)	To protect our rights, property, or safety and that of our staff, our clients or other persons. This may include exchanging personal information with other organisations for the purposes of fraud protection and credit risk reduction.
When we share your information with third parties, we make sure the appropriate safeguards are in place to protect your personal information.
We will never sell, trade, or rent your personal information to anyone.
The HL Currency Service is provided by Currencies Direct on behalf of Hargreaves Lansdown. In providing this service Currencies Direct will act as a separate data controller in providing these services to you. You can view their privacy notice
here
. Personal data and other account information will be shared with HL for management information purposes.
HL uses Stripe to accept and process payments online. Where you enter into such payments, Stripe acts both as a data processor for behalf of HL in processing these, as well as a data controller to process payment data for their own purposes. Full details of how Stripe process personal data can be found at:
https://stripe.com/privacy
.
HL uses Ecospend to accept and process payments online. Where you enter into such payments, Ecospend acts both as a data processor on behalf of HL in processing these, as well as a data controller to process payment data for their own purposes.
Find out more about Ecospend
. Full details of how Ecospend process personal data can be found at:
https://ecospend.com/privacy-policy/
.
We may also disclose and use anonymised, aggregated reporting and statistics about users of our website or our services for the purpose of internal reporting or reporting to our group or other third parties, and for our marketing and promotion purposes. None of these anonymised, aggregated reports or statistics will enable our users to be personally identified.
If your employer or HL, as your employer, offers you access to our Retirement Services product, or you approach us directly, we will share your personal information with third parties (a list of the current providers can be found
here
) for the purposes of obtaining quotes for annuities. The annuity providers may process your personal information for this purpose as a data controller and will be responsible to you for their use of your personal information for this purpose. They will process your personal information in accordance with their own privacy policy which they will provide to you.
7. Transfers outside of the UK and Europe
We usually store your information on our secure servers in the United Kingdom.
However, where we use third parties to process your information for us, for any reason detailed in our Terms and Conditions, we may transfer your information to, and store it and process it inside or outside the UK or European Economic Area. This could be for (but isn’t limited to) the following purposes:
a)	If you’ve agreed with us and your employer that we’ll provide them with your trading activity and account balance details.
b)	Where a fund group in which you hold units requests details of the investors in their funds to comply with their regulatory obligations.
c)	In order to obtain quotations or to arrange investments or insurances with regulated entities.
Where you are a HL colleague, your personal data may be transferred to, and received from our offices in Poland from time to time, where necessary for employment purposes.
Our partners and service providers may also transfer your personal information outside of the UK or European Economic Area.
We’ll take all steps reasonably necessary to make sure that your personal information is treated securely. For example,  we use standard contractual clauses with third parties, so that your information is protected to the same standards as it is in the UK or European Economic Area. If your information is sent to the US, we use standard contractual clauses with third parties, so that your information is protected to the same standards as it is in the UK and European Economic Area. Countries outside the UK and European Economic Area where your personal information can be transferred to include: United States of America, Canada, India and Australia.
8. How long we store your personal information
We keep the personal information we collect from you, your employer, and other third parties, where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (for example, to provide you with a service you have requested or to comply with applicable legal, tax or accounting requirements). In line with this, we maintain internal standards which dictate how long we will retain your personal data.
Generally, all records of services we have provided our clients will be held for a minimum of seven years after our relationship has ended, and for staff for a minimum of six years after your employment with us has ended. However, different personal data will be subject to different retention periods depending on the circumstances or applicable laws. We ensure we maintain internal business standards and processes to review and remove data as necessary.
Further requirements will apply depending on the situation and data we process for you. In certain circumstances, we will keep your information for longer than this - for example if we can't delete it for technical reasons or for compliance with our legal and regulatory obligations. If your personal information is kept for longer than these periods for research and statistical purposes, it will be anonymised.
When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to hold your personal information, we will either delete or anonymise it. If we can’t do this (for example, because your personal information is stored in backup archives), we’ll securely store your personal information, only use it for a purpose we’ve already communicated to you, and isolate it from any further processing until archives are deleted.
Where we process information on behalf of other organisations we apply the same retention periods as above.
9. Marketing
We may collect and use your personal information for undertaking marketing by email, telephone and post.
We may send you certain direct marketing communications (including electronic marketing communications to existing clients) if it is in our legitimate interests to do so for marketing and business development purposes.
However, we will always obtain your consent to direct marketing communications where we are required to do so by law.
You have the right to ask us not to process your personal information for marketing purposes. You can do this by contacting us by post or email using the details in the “Contact Hargreaves Lansdown”
section below
. You can also unsubscribe from emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in every email. If you are a client, you can also unsubscribe by going to the
www.hl.co.uk
website and logging into your account, or, by sending us a secure message. Please note: requests to unsubscribe via post, email or secure message are processed internally and may take longer to mark you as unsubscribed than using the unsubscribe link in the footer of our emails. In any case, we will aim to process all unsubscribe requests received by these methods within 5 working days.
10. Your rights
a)
Right of access:
You have the right of access to any personal information we hold about you. You can ask us for a copy of your personal information; confirmation whether your personal information is being used by us; details about how and why it is being used; and details of what safeguards are in place if we transfer your information outside of the UK or European Economic Area.
b)
Right of to update your information:
If any of the information we hold is inaccurate, you can ask us to make any necessary amendments.
c)
Complaints:
If you have any complaints or concerns about our handling of your personal information please do get in touch with us and we will do our best to resolve these.  You can contact us on 0117 900 9000 or you write to us at the address below in
section 15
.
You have the right to complain about our collection and use of your personal information to the Information Commissioner's Office or the data protection authority in the country where you usually live or work, or where an alleged privacy infringement has taken place. For more information, please contact the local data protection authority at: Information Commissioner’s Office, Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire SK9 5AF or by phone on 0303 123 1113.
You may also seek a remedy through local courts if you believe your rights have been breached.
In certain specific circumstances you also have following further rights:
a)
Right of deletion:
You have a right to ask us to delete any personal information which we are holding about you.
b)
Right to restrict use of your information:
You have a right to ask us to restrict the way that we process your personal information.
c)
Right to data portability:
You have a right to ask us to provide your personal information to a third party provider of services.
d)
Right to object.
You have a right to ask us to consider any valid objections which you have to our use of your personal information where we process your personal information on the basis of our or another person's legitimate interest.
e)
Right to stop marketing:
You have a right to ask us to stop using your personal information for direct-marketing purposes.
We will consider all such requests and provide our response within a reasonable period (and in any event within one month of your request, unless we tell you we are entitled to a longer period required by applicable law). Please note, however, that certain personal information may be exempt from such requests in certain circumstances, for example if we need to keep using the information to comply with our own legal obligations or to establish, exercise or defend legal claims. If an exception applies, we will tell you this when responding to your request. We may request you provide us with information necessary to confirm your identity before responding to any request you make.
If you would like to exercise any of your rights, please submit a request via our
Data Subject Rights Portal
. You will be prompted to provide us with your personal details, a detailed outline of your request, and, if applicable, the period your request covers. You can submit your request as an individual or as an authorised third party on behalf of an individual. You are also able to exercise any of your rights by contacting us on 0117 900 9000 or writing to us at the address detailed in section 15.
11. Using our websites
The websites we own are:
www.hargreaveslansdownjobs.co.uk
www.hl.co.uk
www.hl.uk
www.pensiontime.co.uk
www.corporate-vantage.co.uk
This notice applies when you use one of the above websites and their content. Partners who provide content or other linking sites found on our websites can also gather information and you should check their privacy notices.
If you visit our websites or use our mobile and/or tablet apps (collectively referred to as “our sites”) you acknowledge that the practices described in this notice apply. Our sites can, from time to time, contain links to and from the websites of our partner networks, advertisers and affiliates. If you follow a link to any of these websites, please remember that they have their own policies and that we do not accept any responsibility or liability for their policies or how they collect and use your information.
Our websites let you share via third party social media applications, such as Facebook and Twitter. These social media apps can collect and use information about how you use our sites (see details on 'Social Sharing' cookies in our Cookie Policy). Social media companies can collect and use any personal information that you provide via social media apps according to their own privacy policies, and you should read these carefully before you submit any personal information to these websites. We don’t have control over, or responsibility for, those companies or how they use your information.
12. Children
We do not and will not knowingly collect information from any unsupervised child under the age of 13. If you are under the age of 13, you may not use our sites unless your parent or guardian has provided us with their consent for your use of our sites or our site (as applicable).
13. Cookies & similar technologies
Our websites use cookies and other similar technologies. These are typically small files stored on your computer’s hard drive, which are used to collect your personal information. You can choose to refuse cookies but that can mean you can’t view or use all of our website. For detailed information on the cookies we use, how we use them, and how to refuse them, please see our
cookie policy
.
We also occasionally utilise audience matching, which is a targeted advertising practice that involves sharing “hashed” personal data, such as email addresses or online identifiers, with third parties such as Meta and Google. This allows us to create a target audience for more personalised and relevant advertising campaigns. By hashing your data, your data is converted by an algorithm into a unique string of characters so that no identifiable information is communicated to any third parties. The matching of this hashed data allows both parties to determine whether mutual individuals exist for the purpose of the advertising.
Our lawful basis for utilising audience matching is our legitimate interests in marketing our products and services effectively. You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data for marketing purposes, including audience matching. If you wish to exercise this right, please utilise the contact details provided below.
14. Updating this Privacy Policy
We will update or amend this notice from time to time, to comply with law or to meet our changing business requirements. You should bookmark and periodically review this page to make sure that you are familiar with the most current version and so you’re aware of the information we collect, how we use it and under what circumstances we disclose it. You can see when our most recent update to this Privacy notice was by checking the "Last updated" note at the top of this Privacy notice. If we need to make substantial changes to this notice, we will notify you, if we hold your contact details, by post or by email, before we make any changes unless we are required to make the change sooner (for example regulatory reasons).
15. Contacting us
If you have any questions about your privacy with us or this policy, you can email us at dpo@hl.co.uk, write to us at Hargreaves Lansdown, Data Protection Officer, One College Square South, Anchor Road, Bristol BS1 5HL, or call us on 0117 900 9000.
If you would like to exercise any of your rights, please submit a request via our
Data Subject Rights Portal
.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://stripe.com/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connected Account Agreement
Stripe Payments Company Terms
Acquirer Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Cross River Bank
Deutsche Bank
Goldman Sachs Bank USA
PNC Bank
Issuing Bank Terms
Payment Method Terms
User Bank Debit Authorizations
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Other Products and Programs
Stripe Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Terminal Purchase Terms
Stripe Terminal Reseller Terms
Stripe Atlas Agreement
Stripe Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Privacy Shield Policy
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
E-SIGN Disclosure
Licenses
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Learn more
.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services,
Learn More
, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 1
https://ecospend.com/privacy-policy/:
Ecospend
Privacy Policy
BACKGROUND:
Ecospend understands that your privacy is important to you and that you care about how your personal data is used. We respect and value the privacy of everyone who uses our services and will only collect and use personal data in ways that are described here, and in a way that is consistent with our obligations and your rights under UK data protection laws (such as the EU Regulation 2016/679 as incorporated and amended into UK domestic law (the “UK GDPR”) and the Data Protection Act 2018. Please read this Privacy Policy carefully and ensure that you understand it.. In this Privacy Policy, Ecospend will be referred to as “we”, “us”, or “our”.
1. Information About Us
Ecospend Technologies Limited, a limited company registered in England under company number 11114967. Registered address: The Wingate, 93-107 Shaftesbury Ave, London, UK, W1D 5DY. We are certified by the Financial Conduct Authority, registration number 829713 is the data controller in accordance with the UK GDPR.
2. What Does This Policy Cover?
This Privacy Policy applies only to your use of Ecospend products, services and websites and does not apply to your use of other apps or websites. Please note that we have no control over how your data is collected, stored, or used by other websites and we advise you to check the privacy policies of any such websites before providing any data to them.
You can interact with us in several ways. In this Privacy Policy, we provide you with information on how we process your personal data if you are an/a:
End-user that is using our products and payment service(s);
Customer representative that is representing a current or potential customer of ours (including owners of such); and/or
Website visitor that is interacting with our websites or contacting our support and/or complaints services.
3. What Is Personal Data?
Personal data is defined by the UK GDPR as any information relating to an identifiable person who can be directly or indirectly identified in particular by reference to an identifier. Personal data is, in simpler terms, any information about you that enables you to be identified. Personal data covers obvious information such as your name and contact details, but it also covers less obvious information such as identification numbers, electronic location data, and other online identifiers.
4. What Are Your Rights?
Under the Data Protection Legislation, you have the following rights, which we will always work to uphold:
a)
The right to be informed
about our collection and use of your personal data. This Privacy Policy informs you on how we process your personal dataYou can always contact us to find out more or to ask any questions using the details in Part 12.
b)
The right to access
the personal data we hold about you. Part 11 will tell you how to do this.
c)
The right to have your personal data rectified
if any of your personal data held by us is inaccurate or incomplete. Please contact us using the details in Part 12 to find out more.
d) The right to be forgotten
, i.e., the right to ask us to delete or otherwise dispose of any of your personal data that we hold. In some situations Ecospend is unable to delete your data because we have a legal obligation to keep it. You can read more about our legal obligations to keep data in Part 6. Please contact us using the details in Part 12 to find out more.
e) The right to restrict (i.e., prevent) the processing
of your personal data. You can request that Ecospend restrict the processing of your personal data under certain circumstances, e.g. if you contest the accuracy of the personal data processed by us. We must then restrict the processing while verifying the accuracy of your request.
f)
The right to object
to us using your personal data for a particular purpose or purposes. You can object to the processing of your personal data that Ecospend carries out based on the legal basis of our legitimate interest as specified in this Privacy Policy, whereby we must assess if we can continue to process your personal data. You also have the right to object to processing of your personal data for direct marketing purposes, which includes profiling to the extent that it is related to such direct marketing, whereby your personal data will no longer be processed for such purposes.
g)
The right to withdraw consent
. This means that, if we are relying on your consent as the legal basis for using your personal data, you are free to withdraw that consent at any time.
h)
The right to data portability
. You can request that data processed by Ecospend, on the legal basis of consent and/or performance of a contract, provides all the personal data that Ecospend processes about you in a machine-readable format. In some cases, we are obliged to comply with that request and provide you with the personal data processed about you.
i) Rights  to object to automated decision-making and profiling.
You have the right to object to an automated decision made by Ecospend, if the automated decision produces legal effects or similarly significantly affects you.
j)
Lodge a complaint.
If you have a complaint regarding Ecospend’s processing of your personal data you can lodge a complaint with your supervisory data protection authority, the Information Commissioner’s Office, which you can reach by using this link:
https://ico.org.uk/
.
For more information about our use of your personal data or exercising your rights as outlined above, please contact us using the details provided in Part 12. It is important that your personal data is kept accurate and up-to-date. If any of the personal data we hold about you changes, please keep us informed if we have that data. Further information about your rights can also be obtained from the Information Commissioner’s Office,
https://ico.org.uk/
, or your local Citizens Advice Bureau. If you have any cause for complaint about our use of your personal data, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner’s Office. We would welcome the opportunity to resolve your concerns ourselves, however, so please contact us first, using the details in Part 12.
5. What Data Do We Collect?
Depending on how you interact with us and for what purpose, we collect and process different types of personal data about you. In order for you to more easily understand what type of personal data we may process about you, we have categorised the personal data into the following categories, including data elements:
Identifying Information
– first name, last name, home address (including e.g. flat/house number), telephone number, email address, date of birth, nationality, citizenship, personal identity number, passport number, and/or identity card number, and End-user ID.
Order Identifying Information
– information identifying an End-user’s payment, such as order id number, message id, notification id, direct debit reference code, and the time when the transaction was made.
Financial Information
– sending and/or receiving bank, bank account ownership, bank account number, account balance at the time of the payment, bank account transactions, source of funds and proof of funds.
Device Information
– IP-address, type of device, operating system and browser information.
Behaviour Information
– how End-users use our payment services and/or how website visitors interact with our websites.
Information related to your contacts with Ecospend’s customer service
– information provided by you through channels available on our websites, such as contact forms and email correspondence.
Sensitive Information
– Depending on what information you may provide Ecospend with in relation to the purposes for processing, as stated in this section below, Ecospend may collect sensitive personal information as defined in Article 9 in the UK GDPR. Ecospend may also process such sensitive information in relation to e.g. the purpose of screening your personal information against lists of politically exposed persons (“PEP”) and lists of persons subject to sanctions. Such sensitive information may include personal data that reveals racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs, political or philosophical views, trade union membership, or information about health or sexual orientation.
6. For what purpose do we process your personal data and what legal basis do we rely on?
Depending upon your use of Ecospend, we may collect and hold some or all the personal and non-personal data set out in the table below, using the methods also set out in the table.
Depending on if you are an End-user using our services, a representative to a current or potential customer of ours or a Website visitor interacting with our website, the tables below set out,
Which categories of personal data we process,
For what purpose we process your data
the legal ground we rely on when processing your personal data.
How the personal data is collected
Further down in this Privacy Policy, we will also describe to whom we may share it with, as well as the legal basis that allows us to do this.
6.1 When you as an End-user use our Services
Providing our Service
Ecospend’s proprietary, bank independent, online payment solution enables execution of account-to-account bank transfers online (the/our “Services”). The Services consists of several different features which allows you to:
(a) execute payments from your online bank in a fast, simple and secure manner to an online supplier providing you with a product or service (the “Merchant”), meaning that you can pay for goods and services directly from your bank account (“Pay-in”);
(b) receive payments from the Merchant directly to your bank account in case you e.g. want to return purchased goods (“Pay-out”);
(c) to obtain account information from your online bank and share that information with a service provider in order to set up a direct debit instruction for recurring payments under BACS Direct Debit Scheme (“Direct Debit”) with an online Merchant you wish to purchase goods or services from, without the need for you to login to your bank for each purchase;
(d) authenticate yourself towards a Merchant and/or register an account with the Merchant when making a payment transaction where the Merchant has such identification requirements (“Identity Verification”); and/or
(e) verifying your bank account towards a Merchant (“Account Verification”).
Below we will describe how we process your personal data when using the different features of the Services.
Purpose of the Processing
Type of Personal Data
Legal Basis
How the Data is Collected
To initiate and process a convenient and secure Pay-in to your Merchant.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information.
Contractual obligation.
Identifying Information and Financial Information is provided by your bank.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
To initiate and process a convenient and secure Pay-out to you from your Merchant.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information.
Contractual obligation.
Identifying Information and Financial Information is provided by your bank.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
To collect information to set up a Direct Debit mandate in a convenient way and to facilitate a Direct Debit Payment to your Merchant, in accordance with the Merchant’s instructions.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information.
Contractual obligation.
Identifying Information and Financial Information is provided by your bank. and/or by you.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
To verify your identity and/or update your contact information when the Service is used for verifying your identity towards your Merchant.
Identifying Information.
Contractual obligation.
Identifying Information is provided by your bank.
To refresh your Identifying Information in case of Identity Verification (will be made on a 90-day interval).
Identifying Information.
Pursue our legitimate interest in providing you with the Services.
Identifying Information is provided by your bank.
To verify your bank account when the Service is used for Account Verification.
Identifying Information, Financial Information.
Contractual obligation.
Identifying Information and Financial Information is provided by your bank.
Comply with legal and regulatory obligations
As a licensed payment institution, Ecospend is obliged to follow a set of laws and regulations relating to its processing of payment transactions. Some of the data we collect about you when you use our Services will be used to fulfil these legal and regulatory obligations. For more detailed information on what data we use for legal and regulatory compliance purposes, see the table below.
Purpose of the Processing
Type of Personal Data
Legal Basis
How the Data is Collected
To fulfil our legal obligations to report statistics to authorities on inter alia fraudulent transactions.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information.
Comply with legal obligations.
Identifying Information and Financial Information is provided by your bank and/or by you.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
To fulfil our legal obligations to contact you if a situation would arise that may affect your financial interests or, if you use our Direct Debit  service, to inform you about changes to our terms for use of this service.
Identifying Information.
Comply with legal obligations.
Identifying Information is provided by your bank and/or by you.
To fulfil our legal obligations under bookkeeping law pursuant to which we are obliged to store your personal data relating to a payment.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information.
Comply with legal obligations.
Identifying Information and Financial Information is provided by your bank and/or by you.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Performance and business development
At Ecospend, we always strive to provide you with the best possible user experience. In order to achieve this, we will process your personal data to make sure that our Services work properly and to fix any problems that may occur in the Services. We also use your personal data to ensure that the Services are presented to you in the best way and to understand how we can develop our Services to create even better products. For more detailed information on what data we use for these performance and business development purposes, see the table below.
Purpose of the Processing
Type of Personal Data
Legal Basis
How the Data is Collected
To troubleshoot the Services in case of lack of performance.
Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information, Behaviour Information.
Pursue our legitimate interest in troubleshooting the Services in order to provide you with a working Services.
Financial Information is provided by your bank.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Behaviour Information is provided by you based on how you use our Services.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
Incident management and security
To manage incidents and mitigate the risk that the Services are being used for fraudulent and other illicit actions, we may process your personal data for these types of purposes. For more detailed information on what data we use for this incident management and security purpose, see the table below.
Purpose of the Processing
Type of Personal Data
Legal Basis
How the Data is Collected
To verify your identity for the purpose of preventing our Services from being used for frauds and/or similar illicit actions and to ensure that you reside in a country where we offer our Services. This processing constitutes profiling and automated decision-making. More information about profiling and automated decisions can be found in Part 10.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information, Sensitive Information.
Comply with legal obligations and pursue our legitimate interest to prevent and detect crime such as frauds and to ensure that you reside in a country where we offer our Services.
To the extent the information constitutes Sensitive Information, the legal basis is that the processing is necessary for reasons of public interest (Article 9(2)(g) GDPR). The Sensitive Information may contain e.g. information about political opinion and/or religious beliefs contained in documentation submitted by you.
Identifying and Financial Information is provided by your bank and/or by you.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
Sensitive Information is collected by Ecospend to perform its legal obligations under applicable anti-money laundering legislation.
To fulfil our contractual obligations to inform our Merchant of incidents.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information.
Pursue our legitimate interest of informing our Merchants of incidents.
Identifying and Financial Information is provided by your bank.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
To fulfil our legal obligations to report certain incidents to the Information Commissioner’s Office.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information.
Comply with legal obligations.
Identifying and Financial Information is provided by your bank.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
To establish, exercise and/or defend Ecospend against legal claims.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information.
Pursue our legitimate interest of establishing, exercising and/or defending legal claims.
Identifying and Financial Information is provided by your bank and/or by you.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
6.2 When you as a Customer representative use our Services
Ecospend processes personal data of representatives for our customers being the Merchants or another payment service provider that resells our Services via their channels. This processing is mainly done to administer the business relationship and fulfil our legal obligations to conduct so-called know your customer checks on our customers. If you as a Customer representative provide information regarding other people in your organisation or outside of your organisation, you are responsible for informing them that their data will be processed in accordance with this Privacy Policy. In this section, you can find more specific information on how we process your data in case you are a Customer representative.
Purpose of the Processing
Type of Personal Data
Legal Basis
How the Data is Collected
To fulfil our legal obligations to conduct know your customer checks on you as Customer representative (including performing enhanced due diligence when applicable), which includes verifying your identity and screening of your personal information against PEP-lists and lists of persons subject to sanctions and other similar lists to assess if you imply a money laundering risk. This processing constitutes profiling and automated decision-making. More information about profiling and automated decisions can be found in Part 8.
Identifying Information and when applicable copies of your passport and other documents validating your identity and/or address of ultimate beneficial owners and directors and Sensitive Information containing e.g. information about political opinion and/or religious beliefs contained in documentation submitted by you for example for the purpose of  verifying your country of residence. Sensitive.
Comply with legal obligations.
To the extent the information constitutes Sensitive Information, the legal basis is that the processing is necessary for reasons of public interest (Article 9(2)(g) GDPR).  The Sensitive Information may contain e.g. information about political opinion and/or religious beliefs contained in PEP lists and health information contained in proof/source of funds.
Identifying Information is usually provided to us directly by you as a Customer representative when providing copies of your passport and other documents validating your identity and/or address .
Sensitive Information is provided by you and collected by Ecospend from PEP and sanction lists.
To enter into, manage and maintain a business relationship with you and the company you represent and to communicate important information regarding our Services that is not considered marketing.
Identifying Information.
Pursue our legitimate interest in communicating, managing and maintaining contact with you and the company you represent as well as to verify that the information we have about you is up to date or if we need to communicate information to you about our Services that we assess is important for you to be aware of.
Identifying Information is usually provided by you as a Customer representative.
To market our Services e.g. in case you show interest in our Services by e.g. visiting our events and/or websites, or if we believe that you as a Customer representative would be interested in our Services. There is always an opportunity to opt-out from marketing in an easy and convenient way.
Identifying Information, Behaviour Information.
Pursue our legitimate interest of marketing our Services for commercial purposes and to offer our Services or new Services that we think you as a Customer representative would be interested in.
Identifying Information and Behaviour Information  is usually provided by you as a Customer representative.
6.2.1 Processing personal data related to potential Customer representatives
Purpose of the Processing
Type of Personal Data
Legal Basis
How the Data is Collected
When you contact us or we contact you for the purpose of entering into a potential business relationship regarding our Services.
Identifying Information.
Pursue our legitimate interest of reaching out to potential customers that have shown interest in Ecospend and our Services.
Identifying Information such as contact details from emails and agreements are provided by you.
We may also collect personal data provided by you if you, for example, give us your contact details in relation to campaigns you want to take part of or white papers you wish to receive. Additionally, we may collect your contact details in your capacity as a potential Customer representative from third-party suppliers of Customer registers, for the purpose of marketing our Services to you, if we believe that you would be interested in our Services.
6.3 When you contact our support and/or complaints service
We value your feedback, and we want to understand what we can do to improve our Services and answer any questions that you may have. Therefore, Ecospend has customer support available where you can get in contact with us. When you do this, we will collect certain personal data about you. In this section, you can find more specific information on how we process your data in case you are an individual contacting our support and/or complaints service or if you are a website visitor.
Purpose of the Processing
Type of Personal Data
Legal Basis
How the Data is Collected
To assist you with your question or concern in case you contact our support and/or complaints service, either through channels available on our our websites, such as contact forms or by emailing us.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Device Information, Financial Information, Information related to your contacts with Ecospend’s customer service.
Contractual obligation.
Information related to your contacts with Ecospend’s customer service is provided by you.
Identifying and Financial Information is provided by your bank.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
6.4 Our use of cookies
Ecospend also uses cookies on our websites in order to deliver a well-functioning, personalized and user-friendly experience. Please read our
Cookie Policy
for more information on our use of cookies. In this section, you can find more specific information on how we process your data in case you are an individual visiting our website.
Purpose of the Processing
Type of Personal Data
Legal Basis
How the Data is Collected
To set cookies on your device when you visit and interact with our websites. We use the data generated from cookies for several purposes, such as to make the websites work properly, to gather statistics of how you use and interact with our websites in order to improve its functionality as well as for business-to-business marketing purposes.
Device Information, Behaviour Information.
For necessary cookies, to pursue our legitimate interest of providing you with working and functional websites.
Behaviour Information is provided by you based on how you use our Services.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
Behaviour Information is provided by you based on how you use our Services.
6.5 Other situations
Regardless of who you are, personal data about you may also be processed by us for the purpose of fulfilling your rights as a data subject under the GDPR and to establish, exercise and defend ourselves against legal claims. For more information, please see below.
Purpose of the Processing
Type of Personal Data
Legal Basis
How the Data is Collected
To cater to your rights in accordance with the GDPR and other applicable data protection legislation. For example, if you, as a data subject, contact us and ask us to provide you with the information we have collected about you, we will ask you to verify yourself in order to prevent disclosure of personal data to the wrong person.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information.
Comply with legal obligations and pursue our legitimate interest of verifying your identity in order to prevent disclosure of personal data to the wrong person.
Identifying and Order Identifying Information provided by you through channels available on our websites, such as contact forms and email correspondence.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
Identifying and Financial Information is provided by your bank.
Order Identifying Information is provided by your Merchant.
To handle any complaints or establish, exercise and/or defend Ecospend against legal claims.
Identifying Information, Order Identifying Information, Financial Information, Device Information.
Pursue our legitimate interest of handling complaints or establish, exercise and/or defend legal claims.
Identifying and Order Identifying Information provided by you through channels available on our websites, such as contact forms and email correspondence.
Financial Information is provided by your bank.
Device Information stored when your device interacts with our system through our APIs or website.
7. How Long Will We Keep Your Personal Data?
Personal data processed to fulfil our contractual obligations towards you when you use our Services are stored during the contractual relationship and thereafter during a period from the payment to fulfil the time period stipulated in bookkeeping law. This time period can be extended based on statutes of limitations, for the purpose of establishing, exercising and/or defending Ecospend against legal claims. To fulfil anti-money laundering law, we may need to store your data for additional 5 years after we have ceased to provide the Services to you or your Merchant, unless anti-money laundering law requires us to store your data longer.
Personal data about Customer representatives will, as a main rule, not be stored for a longer period than 5 years from the end of the business relationship between Ecospend and the Merchant, unless we are required by law to store your data longer.
Personal data that is processed for other purposes than for the performance of your contract with Ecospend or for Ecospend to fufil legal obligations are processed as long as necessary to fulfil the respective purpose the personal data was collected for.
Please note however that during the time we store your personal data, the data will not be processed for all of the purposes set out above in this Privacy Policy. Different time periods for processing of your personal data apply depending on the purpose the data was collected for. For example, one set of data, e.g. Financial Information will be processed for several purposes and may for some purposes be processed only for a very short period of time but for other purposes for longer periods of time. Ecospend has implemented various technical and organisation measures, such as automated deletion of data and access restriction to systems where personal data is stored, to ensure that the data is not used for a longer period than necessary to fulfil the respective purpose the data was collected for.
8. Where and how do we store your personal data?
We store your personal data on servers located within the UK and Ireland. However, sometimes, an End-users’ Merchant and/or other third parties that we share your data with, is located outside the UK. This also applies in case we share your personal data with our EU companies that form part of the Trustly Group. If your personal data would be transferred to, and processed by, an End-users’ Merchant, within the Trustly Group, or a third party in a country outside the UK, we will take all reasonable measures to ensure that your data is processed with a high level of security with an adequate level of protection maintained, and that suitable safeguards are adopted in line with applicable data protection legislation requirements, such as the UK GDPR.
Any personal data accessed from these locations is protected by UK data protection standards and is encrypted when transmitted over the Internet. We undertake necessary measures to ensure that your personal data is protected with a high level of security that is appropriate to the risks associated with the processing and maintain physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards to protect it. We restrict access to your personal data to those employees, Ecospend’s representatives and third parties that need to know your information in order for us to be able to fulfil the purpose the data was collected for.
8.1 Public sector Merchants
When using our Services we provide to public sector Merchants your personal data is only processed and stored within the UK.
9. With whom do we share your personal data?
The information we collect about you may be shared with different categories of recipients depending on for what purpose we collected your data. In this section, you can read more about the sharing we do of personal data belonging to End-users, Customer representatives and website visitors and other individuals contacting our support and/or complaint service. When Ecospend shares your personal data with third parties, this is done in a responsible way and in accordance with applicable data protection legislation.
9.1 General
Regardless of who you are, your personal data may be shared with companies that form part of the Trustly Group, a group Ecospend is a part of, when needed to fulfil the purpose the data was collected for. This sharing of data is carried out on the basis that we have a legitimate interest in sharing data within our group for commercial, compliance and organisational reasons.
Please see Trustly Group AB’s privacy policy
here
.
9.2 When you as an End-user use our Services
Your Merchant
For the purpose of your Merchant verifying payments in order to be able to e.g. release any purchased goods, we provide the Merchant with information on the payments. What type of information we send to your Merchant depends on the type of transaction and how the Merchant integrates the Services in their system.
Identifying Information and/or Financial Information may also be forwarded to your Merchant in order for the Merchant to verify your identity when the Services are used for identifying your identity and/or Account Verification. We share this information with the Merchant if the Merchant is legally obliged to verify your identity as a measure to prevent money laundering, fraud or other criminal act or to meet other potential legal and/or regulatory requirements imposed on the Merchant. In certain situations, we may also share your personal data if the Merchant has a legitimate interest to verify your identity or Financial Information or that you indeed are the actual holder of a bank account.
The sharing of your personal data with the Merchant is carried out on the basis that it is necessary for us to fulfil our contractual obligations as well as our legitimate interest to carry out the transaction and the Merchant’s legitimate interest or legal obligation of verifying payments and/or your identity. In addition, our legitimate interest in sharing your personal data with your Merchant is sometimes based on your wish to share your personal information to your Merchant in order for you to verify your identity, bank account and/or use your Merchant’s service, which we provide a simple and convenient solution for.
If one of our contracted Merchants merge, sell, or otherwise restructure a company for which we are contractually obligated to provide our Services, we may share your personal data, in accordance with the purposes set out above, with the acquiring Merchant which takes over the contract with us as part of such merge, acquisition or restructure. This sharing is carried out on the basis that it is necessary for us to fulfil our contractual obligations as well as our legitimate interest to carry out the transaction and the Merchant’s legitimate interest or legal obligation of verifying payments and/or your identity.
Third party payment service providers
When offering our Services, other third-party payment service providers that we collaborate with may be involved. In such cases, we will share your personal data with such third-party providers when necessary for the purpose of settling the payment, preventing fraudulent use of the Services and other criminal acts, and in order for the provider to forward the data to your Merchant. If we do not share data with such third-party payment service provider when such is part of the payment chain, you will not be able to complete the transaction.
This sharing of your personal data with a third-party payment service provider is carried out on the basis that it is necessary for us to fulfil our contractual obligations, as well as our legitimate interest, to carry out the transaction.
For more information about which personal data a third-party payment service provider shares with Ecospend, please contact the relevant provider.
Authorities, banks and payment schemes
To carry out a transaction when using our Services, we need to transfer some of your personal data to your bank and other banks that are part of the payment chain, and relevant national payment schemes such as BACS in the United Kingdom. This processing is carried out on the basis that it is necessary to fulfil our contractual obligations, as well as our legitimate interest, to carry out the transaction and for the purpose of troubleshooting payments.
We may also need to share your personal data and information on payments to police, tax and other relevant authorities, and possibly your bank and/or other banks that are part of the payment chain. This is done when necessary to investigate payment transactions for the purposes of preventing and disclosing breaches against anti-money laundering legislation, fraudulent use of the Services and other criminal acts. We may also share your personal data with authorities for audit purposes. When sharing your personal data for these purposes with authorities, this is carried out on the basis of our obligation to comply with legal obligations to which we are subject. When sharing your personal data for these purposes with your bank and/or other banks that are part of the payment chain, this is carried out on the basis of our legitimate interest to prevent frauds and other criminal acts.
Other third parties with whom we collaborate
To carry out a transaction when using our Services, we may need to share your personal data with collaboration partners such as official identity verification service providers and similar service providers in order to confirm your identity, proof of funds, source of funds and/or update/supplement your contact information, as applicable. The sharing of personal data with such third parties is carried out on the basis that it is necessary to fulfil our contractual obligations, our legitimate interest to carry out the transaction, our legal obligation to verify your identity and/or financial information if you use our Services, and, sometimes, your Merchant’s legal obligation to verify your identity.
We may from time to time also need to share your personal data with cloud-based service providers, such as providers of technical server capacity. This is done for the purpose of providing the Services and/or to improve the Services, for example by data analysing and testing. When your personal data is shared with such third parties, the third party will typically act as data processor in relation to your personal data, meaning that it will process your personal data on our behalf and in accordance with our instructions.
9.3 When you are a Customer representative
If you are a Customer representative, we may need to share your personal data with providers of sanctions and PEP lists and other similar lists, in order to screen your personal data against such lists as part of our know your customer checks to assess implications of any money laundering risks. The sharing of personal data is then carried out on the basis that it is necessary in order to comply with our legal obligations.
Authorities and banks
We may need to share your personal data to the police, tax and other relevant authorities, and possibly banks that are part of the payment chain (of our End-users). This is done when necessary to investigate payment transactions for the purposes of preventing and disclosing breaches against anti-money laundering legislation, fraudulent use of the Services and other criminal acts. We may also share your personal data with authorities for audit purposes. When sharing your personal data for these purposes with authorities, this is carried out on the basis of our obligation to comply with legal obligations to which we are subject. When sharing your personal data for these purposes with your bank and/or other banks that are part of the Merchant’s/End-user’s payment chain, this is carried out on the basis of our legitimate interest to prevent frauds and other criminal acts.
Other third parties with whom we collaborate
In addition, we may from time to time also need to share your personal data with cloud-based service providers, such as providers of technical server capacity or CRM providers. This is done for the purpose of providing the Services and/or to improve the Services, for example by data analysing and testing. When your personal data is shared with such third parties, the third party will typically act as data processor in relation to your personal data, meaning that it will process your personal data on our behalf and in accordance with our instructions.
9.4 When you visit our websites, contact our support and/or complaints service
We may  share your personal data to other third-party providers of analytical tools based, in order for us to provide you with a pleasant user experience when interacting with our websites.
If you are a Customer representative, we may also share your personal data with third party payment providers for the purpose of providing you with an opportunity to be onboarded by such payment providers. We will only share your personal data for this purpose based on your consent.
In addition, we may from time to time also need to share your personal data with cloud-based service providers, such as providers of technical server capacity.
9.5 When you use our-/interact with us on social media
If you interact (e.g. like/comment a post, contact or follow us) with our designated accounts on social media your personal data will also be collected and processed by these companies, in accordance with their data protection information. This also applies to the response you receive from us. The sharing takes place to pursue our legitimate interest of interacting with you in case of e.g. questions or complaints on our social media.
9.6 Persons holding a power of attorney for an End-user
Your personal data may be shared with a person who has been given the right to access it under a power of attorney. Trustly shares your personal data with such holder based on our legitimate interest to handle your request provided to us via a power of attorney.
9.7 Mergers and acquisitions
We may need to share your personal data and information in connection with planned and/or finalized company acquisitions or restructuring of the Trustly Group, that Ecospend is a part of.  If Ecospend is to be restructured, e.g. is divided into several different operations, or if an outside party wishes to acquire Ecospend, we will disclose your and other customers’ personal data to the acquiring company. This may entail any personal data which you have provided to us or that we have collected in connection with our Services. This processing is carried out on the basis of our legitimate interest in enabling an acquisition or restructuring process. If Ecospend ceases to exist, e.g. through a merger, liquidation or bankruptcy, we will transfer or delete your personal data as long as we do not need to save them to meet legal requirements. If Ecospend is acquired by an acquiring company or split up in connection with a restructuring, we will continue to save and use your personal data according to the terms herein, unless you receive other information in connection with the transfer/such acquisition.
10. Profiling and automated decision making
Ecospend sometimes uses profiling and automated decision making when providing its Services. In this section, you can read more about when and why we used these measures.
“Profiling” is when personal data is automatically processed for the purpose of evaluating personal aspects relating to an individual, for example a person’s economic situation or personal preferences.
“Automated decision making” is when automated means without human intervention are used for making a decision in relation to an individual, for example, automated denial of service.
You have the right to object to decisions based on automated individual decision-making, including profiling. How to object to these types of decisions is described in Part 4.
10.1 When you use our Services
When providing our Direct Debit service to you, we may use automated decision making and/or profiling for the purpose of verifying your identity to ensure that you reside in a country where we offer our Direct Debit service and to assess risks related to your payments.
In addition, when you use our Service, we may use automated decision making, including profiling, for the purpose of verifying your identity and assessing your financial information to fulfil our legal obligations to conduct know your customer checks on you, verifying your identity to ensure that you reside in a country where we offer our Services, fulfilling legal requirements in relation to our anti-money laundering obligations to monitor your payments processed by us and screening your personal information against lists of politically exposed persons (“PEP”) and lists of persons subject to sanctions. The processing of your personal data in this automated decision making is carried out on the basis that it is necessary in order for us to fulfil our contractual obligations towards you to carry out payments or to comply with legal requirements, as the case may be.
10.2 When you are a Customer representative
We may use profiling and automated decision making for the purpose of screening your personal information against PEP-lists and lists of persons subject to sanctions. We may also use profiling to  evaluate potential customer leads, for example by setting scores on you based on how much interest you have shown in Ecospend, such as number of website visits, if you have signed up for information material on our websites, etc. The processing of your personal data in this profiling is based on our commercial legitimate interest of reaching out to potential or current customers of ours that have shown interest in Ecospend and our Services.
11. How Can You Access Your Personal Data?
If you want to know what personal data we have about you, you can ask us for details of that personal data and for a copy of it (where any such personal data is held). This is known as a subject access request or SAR. All subject access requests should be made in writing and sent to the email or postal addresses shown in Part 12. To make this as easy as possible for you, a Subject Access Request Form is available for you to use. You do not have to use this form, but it is the easiest way to tell us everything we need to know to respond to your request as quickly as possible. If your request is manifestly unfounded or excessive (for example, if you make repetitive requests) a fee may be charged to cover our administrative costs in responding. We will respond to your subject access request within three weeks and, in any case, not more than one month of receiving it. Normally, we aim to provide a complete response, including a copy of your personal data within that time. In some cases, however, particularly if your request is more complex, more time may be required up to a maximum of three months from the date we receive your request. You will be kept fully informed of our progress.
12. How Do You Contact Us?
To contact us about anything to do with your personal data and data protection, including to make a subject access request, please use the following details [for the attention of the Data Protection Officer, Ecospend Technologies Limited:
Email address:
dpo@ecospend.com
.
Postal Address: The Wingate, 93-107 Shaftesbury Ave, London, UK, W1D 5DY.
13. Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. This may be necessary, for example, if the law changes, or if we change our business in a way that affects personal data protection. Any changes will be immediately posted on the Ecospend website. Please check this Privacy Policy every time you make a transaction using our Services, as updates may include information on additional processing activities we intend to perform going forward. We recommend that you check this page regularly to keep up to date.
This Privacy Policy was last updated on
July 25, 2024.